Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.11.020

Powers vested in legislative bodies of noncharter and charter code cities.

The legislative body of each code city shall have power to organize and regulate its internal affairs within the provisions of this title and its charter, if any; and to define the functions, powers, and duties of its officers and employees; within the limitations imposed by vested rights, to fix the compensation and working conditions of such officers and employees and establish and maintain civil service, or merit systems, retirement and pension systems not in conflict with the provisions of this title or of existing charter provisions until changed by the people: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section or in this title shall permit any city, whether a code city or otherwise, to enact any provisions establishing or respecting a merit system or system of civil service for firefighters and police officers which does not substantially accomplish the same purpose as provided by general law in chapter 41.08 RCW for firefighters and chapter 41.12 RCW for police officers now or as hereafter amended, or enact any provision establishing or respecting a pension or retirement system for firefighters or police officers which provides different pensions or retirement benefits than are provided by general law for such classes.

Such body may adopt and enforce ordinances of all kinds relating to and regulating its local or municipal affairs and appropriate to the good government of the city, and may impose penalties of fine not exceeding five thousand dollars or imprisonment for any term not exceeding one year, or both, for the violation of such ordinances, constituting a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor as provided therein. However, the punishment for any criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in state law for the same crime. Such a body alternatively may provide that violation of such ordinances constitutes a civil violation subject to monetary penalty, but no act which is a state crime may be made a civil violation.

The legislative body of each code city shall have all powers possible for a city or town to have under the Constitution of this state, and not specifically denied to code cities by law. By way of illustration and not in limitation, such powers may be exercised in regard to the acquisition, sale, ownership, improvement, maintenance, protection, restoration, regulation, use, leasing, disposition, vacation, abandonment or beautification of public ways, real property of all kinds, waterways, structures, or any other improvement or use of real or personal property, in regard to all aspects of collective bargaining as provided for and subject to the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, and in the rendering of local social, cultural, recreational, educational, governmental, or corporate services, including operating and supplying of utilities and municipal services commonly or conveniently rendered by cities or towns.

In addition and not in limitation, the legislative body of each code city shall have any authority ever given to any class of municipality or to all municipalities of this state before or after the enactment of this title, such authority to be exercised in the manner provided, if any, by the granting statute, when not in conflict with this title. Within constitutional limitations, legislative bodies of code cities shall have within their territorial limits all powers of taxation for local purposes except those which are expressly preempted by the state as provided in RCW 66.08.120, * 82.36.440, 48.14.020, and 48.14.080.

[ 2007 c 218 s 66; 1993 c 83 s 8; 1986 c 278 s 7; 1984 c 258 s 807; 1969 ex.s. c 29 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.11.020.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 82.36 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2013 c 225 s 501, effective July 1, 2016.

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Effective date—1993 c 83: See note following RCW 35.21.163.

Severability—1986 c 278: See note following RCW 36.01.010.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 29: "The effective date of this act is July 1, 1969." [ 1969 ex.s. c 29 s 2.]